Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1271.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 9, chapter 4, article 8, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 9-500.54, to read: START_STATUTE9-500.54. Businesses; crime reporting; municipal penalties; prohibition; exception A. A municipality may not enact, enforce or maintain an ordinance, rule, regulation, policy or practice that imposes a fine or any other penalty on a business or commercial entity that is based on the number of or frequency of requests for public safety assistance or emergency services made by the business or commercial entity at any location of the business or commercial entity or that is based on the monetary value of property that belongs to the business or commercial entity that has been damaged or stolen. B. Notwithstanding subsection A of this section, a municipality may enforce or maintain an ordinance, rule, regulation, policy or practice that imposes a fine or any other penalty on a business or commercial entity that is based on the number of or frequency of requests for public safety assistance or emergency services made by the business or commercial entity at any location of the business or commercial entity or that is based on the monetary value of property that belongs to the business or commercial entity that has been damaged or stolen if both of the following apply: 1. The requests for public safety assistance or emergency services made by the business or commercial entity are any of the following: (a) malicious. (b) knowingly false. (c) frivolous. 2. the municipality has provided the business or commercial entity with a written notice indicating that the municipality has determined that prior requests for public safety assistance or emergency services made by the business or COMMERCIAL entity are malicious, knowingly false or frivolous. C. This section does not apply to faulty or repeated nonemergency alerts from alarm systems. For the purposes of this subsection, "alarm system" has the same meaning prescribed in section 32-101.END_STATUTE APPROVED BY THE GOVERNOR JUNE 19, 2026. FILED IN THE OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE JUNE 22, 2026.